Alabama, session 2026rs, HB110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a)(1) Pursuant to the procedures for
issuance and renewal of driver licenses and nondriver
identification cards established in Chapter 6 of Title 32,
Code of Alabama 1975, the Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency
(ALEA), contingent upon the availability of funds, shall issue
a digital driver license or nondriver identification card and
may charge an additional fee of up to fifteen dollars ($15),
which may be displayed through an ALEA-approved mobile
electronic method.
(2) The digital driver license or nondriver
identification card may be issued in addition to a physical
driver license or nondriver identification card.
(b) The digital driver license or nondriver
identification card shall contain all information present on a
physical driver license or nondriver identification card,
including a bar code or other mechanism, as utilized to reveal
the information.
(c) A licensee may produce a valid ALEA-approved
digital driver license in lieu of possessing a physical driver
license when operating a motor vehicle or vessel pursuant to
Section 32-6-9, Code of Alabama 1975.
Page 1

Section 32-6-9, Code of Alabama 1975.
HB110 Enrolled
(d)(1) Upon demand of a judge of any court in this
state, a peace officer, a state trooper, or any other state or
local governmental entity, a licensee may produce an
ALEA-approved digital driver license or nondriver
identification card, and it shall be recognized as though it
were a physical driver license or nondriver identification
card.
(2) A licensee may not produce an approved digital
driver license or nondriver identification card in place of a
physical driver license or nondriver identification card as a
valid form of voter photo identification pursuant to Section
17-9-30, Code of Alabama 1975.
(e) If the licensee displays the digital driver license
or nondriver identification card through the ALEA-approved
mobile method, the individual is not implicitly consenting to
allow access to or to search other contents of the wireless
communication or electronic device other than provided for by
law.
(f) ALEA shall apply reasonable industry standards of
security to protect the integrity of the digital driver
license or nondriver identification card and privacy of the
licensee.
(g) ALEA may adopt rules to implement this section.
(h) ALEA shall deposit monies collected from the
additional fee under subsection (a) into the Public Safety
Fund in the State Treasury.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB110 Enrolled






________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 27-Jan-26, as amended.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 10-Mar-26 Amended and Passed

House 12-Mar-26 Concurred in Senate
Amendment


Page 3